Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.900

Transfer of powers, duties, and functions—Legislative oral history program.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the secretary of state pertaining to the legislative oral history program are transferred to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives. All references to the secretary of state or the office of the secretary of state in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the secretary of state pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

(b) Any appropriations made to the secretary of state for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on June 12, 2008, be transferred and credited to the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All rules and all pending business before the secretary of state pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the secretary of state shall not affect the validity of any act performed before June 12, 2008.

(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(6) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public employment relations commission as provided by law.

(7) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives will determine location and staff reporting for the program.

[ 2008 c 222 s 9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.